Washington statutes.
RCW 41.26.150

Sickness or disability benefits—Medical services.

(1) Whenever any active member, or any member hereafter retired, on account of service, sickness, or disability, not caused or brought on by dissipation or abuse, of which the disability board shall be judge, is confined in any hospital or in home, and whether or not so confined, requires medical services, the employer shall pay for the active or retired member the necessary medical services not payable from some other source as provided for in subsection (2) of this section. In the case of active or retired firefighters the employer may make the payments provided for in this section from the firefighters' pension fund established pursuant to RCW 41.16.050 where the fund had been established prior to March 1, 1970. If this pension fund is depleted, the employer shall have the obligation to pay all benefits payable under chapters 41.16 and 41.18 RCW.

(a) The disability board in all cases may have the active or retired member suffering from such sickness or disability examined at any time by a licensed physician or physicians, to be appointed by the disability board, for the purpose of ascertaining the nature and extent of the sickness or disability, the physician or physicians to report to the disability board the result of the examination within three days thereafter. Any active or retired member who refuses to submit to such examination or examinations shall forfeit all rights to benefits under this section for the period of the refusal.

(b) The disability board shall designate the medical services available to any sick or disabled member.

(2) The medical services payable under this section will be reduced by any amount received or eligible to be received by the member under workers' compensation, social security including the changes incorporated under Public Law 89-97, insurance provided by another employer, other pension plan, or any other similar source. Failure to apply for coverage if otherwise eligible under the provisions of Public Law 89-97 shall not be deemed a refusal of payment of benefits thereby enabling collection of charges under the provisions of this chapter.

(3) Upon making the payments provided for in subsection (1) of this section, the employer shall be subrogated to all rights of the member against any third party who may be held liable for the member's injuries or for payment of the cost of medical services in connection with a member's sickness or disability to the extent necessary to recover the amount of payments made by the employer.

(4) Any employer under this chapter, either singly, or jointly with any other such employer or employers through an association thereof as provided for in chapter 48.21 RCW, may provide for all or part of one or more plans of group hospitalization and medical aid insurance to cover any of its employees who are members of the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system, and/or retired former employees who were, before retirement, members of the retirement system, through contracts with regularly constituted insurance carriers, with health maintenance organizations as defined in chapter 48.46 RCW, or with health care service contractors as defined in chapter 48.44 RCW. Benefits payable under the plan or plans shall be deemed to be amounts received or eligible to be received by the active or retired member under subsection (2) of this section.

(5) Any employer under this chapter may, at its discretion, elect to reimburse a retired former employee under this chapter for premiums the retired former employee has paid for medical insurance that supplements medicare, including premiums the retired former employee has paid for medicare part B coverage.

[ 2013 c 23 s 70; 1992 c 22 s 3; 1991 c 35 s 22; 1987 c 185 s 12; 1983 c 106 s 23; 1974 ex.s. c 120 s 11; 1971 ex.s. c 257 s 10; 1970 ex.s. c 6 s 10; 1969 ex.s. c 219 s 4; 1969 ex.s. c 209 s 15.]

NOTES:

Intent—1991 c 35: See note following RCW 41.26.005.

Intent—Severability—1987 c 185: See notes following RCW 51.12.130.

Severability—1974 ex.s. c 120: See note following RCW 41.26.030.

Purpose—Severability—1971 ex.s. c 257: See notes following RCW 41.26.030.